src/phonology/rus-phon.twolc
!! ==> 047 <==
!! ============================================================================
"U>ь in Imperatives with consonant stem (exceptions in previous rule)"
%^U:ь <=> .#. [ ?* - [ VyPrefix ?* ]] :V [ :C - [ :щ | :г | :й ] ] (%^M:0) %<: _ ( т е ) ( с [ я: | ь ] ) .#. ;
                ! отве́т<U
                ! отве́т_ь

!! ==> 048 <==
!! ============================================================================
"U>0 in Imperatives with velar stem, i.e. лечь"
%^U:0 <=>                                             [:я́ | :я] :г (%^M:0) %<: _ ( т е ) ( с [ я: | ь ] ) .#. ; ! only applies to ~лечь
                                                                         й %<: _ ( т е ) ( с [ я: | ь ] ) .#. ;
	! повы́бFей<U    ля́г<U
	! повы́б_ей__	ля́г__

!! ==> 049 <==
!! ============================================================================
"я>ь (i.e. ся>сь) in singular reflexive imperatives"
я:ь <=> %<: [ :и | :и́ ] с: _ .#. ;
